Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,242.01
Caterer, defined.

Caterer shall mean a person in the business of providing food to a customer for parties, banquets, or other similar functions at a location owned, rented, or otherwise controlled by the customer.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 5.